Nebraska, session 109, LB855.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB855 LB855
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 8 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Youth Early Intervention and Support Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds that: (a) Early signs of trauma,
neglect, or instability in youth often manifest through patterns of
school disengagement, academic decline, and unmet physical needs; (b)
research on adverse childhood experiences confirms a direct link between
early trauma and negative outcomes in education, health, and justice
system involvement; (c) effective early intervention can be achieved when
schools, families, community health workers, and public systems work
together in a coordinated and trauma-informed manner; and (d) many
schools and communities already possess networks of support professionals
and organizations who, if connected through a formal system, can identify
and respond to student needs without requiring additional full-time
employees.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to: (a) Establish a
standardized framework for early identification and support using
existing school and community data; and (b) promote cross-sector
collaboration to reduce juvenile justice and child welfare involvement.
Sec. 3. (1) The State Department of Education, in consultation with
the Department of Health and Human Services, shall develop and administer
an early support system to be implemented in all Nebraska public school
districts.
(2) The early support system shall identify students who exhibit two
or more of the following early warning indicators: (a) Chronic or sudden
changes in school attendance; (b) declining academic performance or
incomplete work; (c) persistent or unusual behavior challenges; (d) lack
of engagement or participation in class; (e) observable hygiene concerns,
including body odor or unwashed clothing; or (f) documented or disclosed
exposure to adverse childhood experiences.
(3) The goal of the early support system is not punitive, but is to
facilitate early, compassionate, trauma-informed interventions through
-2-

LB855 LB855
2026 2026
collaborative planning and service coordination.
Sec. 4. (1) Each school district shall convene a youth support
coordination team to implement the early support system. This team may
include, but is not limited to: (a) School counselors or social workers;
(b) teachers and administrators; (c) community health workers from public
health agencies or nonprofit organizations; (d) representatives from
community-based organizations; (e) public health or behavioral health
liaisons; and (f) parents or family and community advocates.
(2) Each youth support coordination team shall: (a) Develop
protocols for reviewing flagged student data; (b) conduct trauma-informed
needs assessments; (c) engage families in support planning; (d)
coordinate referrals to mental health, academic, and basic needs
resources; and (e) document and monitor interventions using secure
systems.
(3) The team shall designate a lead agency or coordinator which may
be a school district, nonprofit organization, local public health
department, or educational service unit.
Sec. 5. (1) Each school district shall include one or more
community health workers on the school district's youth support
coordinating team, using existing partnerships with (a) federally
qualified health centers, (b) local public health departments, (c)
behavioral health organizations, and (d) community-based nonprofit
organizations.
(2) Community health workers shall support (a) family outreach and
trust-building, (b) social determinants of health screening, (c)
referrals and linkage to resources, and (d) culturally responsive and
trauma-informed care.
Sec. 6. (1) The State Department of Education shall: (a) Provide
standardized protocols and training materials on trauma-informed care,
adverse childhood experiences, community health worker integration, the
federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, as amended, 20
-3-

LB855 LB855
2026 2026
U.S.C. 1232g, the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, and cultural responsiveness; (b) offer technical assistance
to school districts for implementation, team formation, and referral
coordination; and (c) maintain or enhance secure data systems to enable
districts to flag and track student indicators.
(2) The Department of Health and Human Services shall support cross-
agency collaboration, including: (a) Participation in training efforts;
(b) integration of relevant health and behavioral health resources; and
(c) promotion of community health worker workforce support and
deployment.
Sec. 7. (1) All data collected shall comply with the federal Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, as amended, 20 U.S.C. 1232g
and the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996.
(2) No student shall be referred to law enforcement or child welfare
based solely on early support system indicators unless legally required
due to imminent risk.
(3) The Department of Health and Human Services shall monitor
implementation to prevent disproportionate impact based on race,
disability, income, or language.
Sec. 8. Each school district shall submit an annual implementation
report to the State Department of Education. The department shall compile
such implementation data and electronically submit an annual report to
the Legislature that evaluates (1) the number of students identified and
supported, (2) the interventions provided, (3) stakeholder feedback, and
(4) outcomes related to attendance, achievement, and system involvement.
-4-